src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#gávcci             K                ;
             gávcci+Num+Ess:#logi#gávcci%>n          K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#gávcci             K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#gávcci             K                ;
       gávcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#gávcci             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#gávcci%>s          K                ;
 gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#gávcci%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#gákcá%>j           K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#gávcci             K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#gávcci             K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#gávcci%>t          K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#gávcci%>jde        K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#gávcci%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIGAVCCI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#gávcci         K                ;
             gávcci+Num+Ess:#logi#gávcci%>n          K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#gávcci             K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#gávcci             K                ;
       gávcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#gávcci             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#gávcci%>s          K                ;
 gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#gávcci%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#gákcá%>j           K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#gávcci             K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#gávcci             K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#gávcci%>t          K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#gávcci%>jde        K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#gávcci%>jguin      K                ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIGAVCCI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#gávcci             K                ;
             gávcci+Num+Ess:e#logi#gávcci%>n          K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#gávcci             K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#gávcci             K                ;
       gávcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#gávcci             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#gávcci%>s          K                ;
 gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#gávcci%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#gákcá%>j           K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#gávcci             K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#gávcci             K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#gávcci%>t          K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#gávcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#gávcci%>jde        K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#gávcci%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGAVCCI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:htta#logi#gávcci         K                ;
             gávcci+Num+Ess:htta#logi#gávcci%>n      K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#gávcci         K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#gávcci         K                ;
       gávcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#gávcci         NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#gávcci%>s      K                ;
 gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#gávcci%>n      K                ; ! !SOUTH
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#gákcá%>j       K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#gávcci         K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#gávcci         K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#gávcci%>t      K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#gávcci%>X5jd   K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#gávcci%>X5jd   K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#gávcci%>X5jd   K                ;
     gávcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#gávcci%>X5jd   K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#gávcci%>jde    K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K                ;
          gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#gávcci%>jguin  K                ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIOVCCI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#ovcci             K                ;
             ovcci+Num+Ess:#logi#ovcci%>n          K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#ovcci             K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#ovcci             K                ;
       ovcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#ovcci             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#ovcci%>s          K                ;
 ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#ovcci%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#okcá%>j           K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#ovcci             K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#ovcci             K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#ovcci%>t          K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
     ovcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd       K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#ovcci%>jde        K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K                ;
          ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#ovcci%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   guoktelogi:guokºt         GUOKTELOGIGAVCCI   ;
   golbmalogi:golbma         GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI   ;
   golbmalogi:golbma         GOLBMALOGIOVCCI    ;
 njealljelogi:njeallj        GUOKTELOGIGAVCCI   ;
   vihttalogi:vi             VIHTTALOGIGAVCCI   ;
   guhttalogi:gu             VIHTTALOGIGAVCCI   ;
    čiežalogi:čieža          GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI   ;
    giežalogi:gieža          GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI   ;
    čiežalogi:čieža          GOLBMALOGIOVCCI    ;
    giežalogi:gieža          GOLBMALOGIOVCCI    ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci         GAVCCILOGIGAVCCI   ;
    gákcilogi:gákci          GAVCCILOGIGAVCCI   ;
    ovccilogi:ovcci          GAVCCILOGIGAVCCI   ;
